Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 12 Governor

Cross references.

Constitutional provisions relating to Governor, see Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. I and Sec. II.

Penalty for unauthorized display of sign, tag, or other item, on motor vehicle so as to convey impression that owner of motor vehicle is member of Governor’s staff, §

45-1-3

.

Organization of executive branch of state government generally, T. 50, C. 4.